Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB450.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 132.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, before
a[any] person's name shall appear before the voters on election day as a
candidate for the office of property valuation administrator in any
primary or general election,[ except a current property valuation
administrator already qualified as a candidate to succeed himself or
herself in office,] or before that person may be appointed as a property
valuation administrator, the[except as an interim appointee as provided
by KRS 132.375, that] person shall hold a certificate issued by the
department[,] showing that he or she has been examined by the
department and is qualified for the office.
2. This section shall not apply to:
a. A current property valuation administrator already qualified as a
candidate to succeed himself or herself in office; or
b. An interim appointee as provided by KRS 132.375.
(b) All certificates issued shall expire one (1) year from the date of issuance.
(c) 1. The examinations shall be offered by the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System during the examination period.
2. The department shall provide the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System with the examination questions and other relevant
information for administering the examination.
3. The examination questions[examinations] shall be written and
formulated so as to test fairly the ability and fitness of the applicant to
serve as a property valuation administrator.
(d) The examination period shall be open nine (9) months prior to the first day
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/7/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 898
a candidate is eligible to file for the office of property valuation
administrator and closed three (3) weeks before the candidate filing
deadline.
(e) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall work with
the department to promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to establish the registration process and fees for the
examination[The department shall hold the examination at a central location
during the month of November of each year immediately preceding each year
in which property valuation administrators are to be elected].
(f)[(e)] The department shall, at least thirty (30) days prior to the examination
period, issue a statewide press release announcing the examination and post
the announcement on the department's website[Web site].
[(f) Any person desiring to take an examination shall appear at the time and place
designated.
(2) (a) If, after the giving of the examination, as provided in subsection (1) of this
section, there is no person qualified to be a candidate in the county, the
department shall hold a second examination.
(b) Applicants from only those counties having no person qualified shall be
eligible to take the examination.
(c) Notice of the second examination shall be made by issuing a press release in
those counties and posting an announcement for the examination on the
department's Web site at least fourteen (14) days prior to the second
examination.]
(2)[(3)] [(a) ]If no qualified candidate files for the office, the department shall cause
a special examination to[shall] be given by the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System at a time determined by the department.[
(b) ] Notice of[ and registration for] the special examination shall be issued in a
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/7/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 898
statewide press release and posted on the department's website at least thirty
(30) days prior to the special examination being held[provided in the same
manner as provided in subsection (2) of this section].
(3)[(4)] (a) Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of property valuation
administrator to be filled by appointment or by election, and there is not more
than one (1) person holding a valid certificate and eligible for appointment or
election, the department shall cause[hold] a special examination to be held by
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System for applicants
seeking a certificate for the office. Notice of the special examination shall be
provided in the same manner as subsection (2) of this section.
(b) If only one (1) person is qualified[,] after the[ giving of a ] special
examination is held,[ only one (1) person is qualified,] the county
judge/executive may request a second examination to be held by the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System.
[(c) ]Notice of[ and registration for] the second[special] examination shall be
issued in a statewide press release and posted on the department's website at
least thirty (30) days before the second examination is held[provided in the
same manner as provided by subsection (2) of this section].
(4)[(5)] (a) Examinations shall be given and graded in accordance with rules
created by[of] the department and published at the time of the examination.
(b) After a candidate completes the examination, the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System shall communicate to the department any
information necessary from the candidate's examination for the department
to determine whether the candidate passed the examination. Within ten (10)
days of receipt of the information[after the examination], a certificate of
fitness and qualification to fill the office of property valuation administrator
shall be issued by the department to the candidate if he or she passed the
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/7/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 898
examination[each person passing the examination].
(5)[(6)] Examination records shall be preserved by the department for twelve (12)
months after the examination, and the record of any person who took the
examination may be seen by him or her at the office of the department in Frankfort,
Kentucky.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/7/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed